California, session 20252026, AB25.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Voter ID and Election Integrity Act of 2025.SEC. 2. Section 2110 is added to the Elections Code, to read:2110. (a) (1) On the affidavit of registration, a person shall certify under penalty of perjury that the person is a citizen. The person shall provide appropriate documentation of citizenship with the affidavit of registration.(2) Based on the documentation of citizenship provided pursuant to paragraph (1), the elections official shall verify whether the person is a citizen.(3) A person who does not provide appropriate documentation of citizenship with the affidavit of registration, or a person whose citizenship cannot be verified by the elections official based on the documentation provided, shall not be registered to vote.(b) An elections official shall verify the citizenship of voters registered to vote in the county as of January 1, 2026. The elections official may require a person to provide appropriate documentation of citizenship for purposes of verifying the person’s citizenship pursuant to this subdivision.SEC. 3. Section 2111 of the Elections Code is repealed.2111.A person may prove he or she is a citizen by his or her certification under penalty of perjury on the affidavit of registration.SEC. 4. Section 2112 of the Elections Code is repealed.2112.Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the fact that a person certifies to his or her United States citizenship by signing his or her affidavit of registration shall be deemed evidence of citizenship for voting purposes only.SEC. 5. Section 2186 is added to the Elections Code, to read:2186. (a) Upon request, the elections official shall furnish the roster to the State Auditor for purposes of this section.(b) (1) The State Auditor shall periodically review a random sample of a county’s roster to identify persons listed on the roster who are not qualified electors in that county.(2) If in the review described in paragraph (1) the State Auditor determines that fewer than 98 percent of the persons listed on the roster are qualified electors in that county, for the next statewide election the elections official shall not mail the materials specified in Section 3010 to every registered voter pursuant to Section 3000.5. For the next statewide election, the elections official shall mail a vote by mail ballot to any qualified elector who requests a vote by mail ballot pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3200) of Division 3.SEC. 6. Section 3000.5 of the Elections Code is amended to read:3000.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, for each election, the elections official shall, no later than 29 days before the day of the election, begin mailing the materials specified in Section 3010 to every registered voter. voter, except as provided in Sections 2186 and 15301. The elections official shall have five days to mail a ballot to each person who is registered to vote on the 29th day before the day of the election and five days to mail a ballot to each person who is subsequently registered to vote. The elections official shall not discriminate against any region or precinct in choosing which ballots to mail first within the prescribed five-day mailing period.(b) The distribution of vote by mail ballots to all registered voters does not prevent a voter from voting in person at a polling place, vote center, or other authorized location.(c) Consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2226, this section is not intended and shall not be construed to authorize a voter with an inactive voter registration status to receive a vote by mail ballot for an election.SEC. 7. Section 3011 of the Elections Code is amended to read:3011. (a) The identification envelope shall contain all of the following:(1) A declaration, under penalty of perjury, stating that the voter resides within the precinct in which the voter is voting and is the person whose name appears on the envelope.(2) The signature of the voter.(3) The residence address of the voter as shown on the affidavit of registration.(4) The last four digits of the voter’s valid government-issued form of identification.(4)(5) The date of signing.(5)(6) A notice that the envelope contains an official ballot and is to be opened only by the canvassing board.(6)(7) A warning plainly stamped or printed on it that voting twice constitutes a crime.(7)(8) A warning plainly stamped or printed on it that the voter must sign the envelope in the voter’s own handwriting in order for the ballot to be counted.(8)(9) A statement that the voter has neither voted nor intends to vote a ballot from any other jurisdiction for the same election.(9)(10) The name and signature of the person authorized by the voter to return the vote by mail ballot pursuant to Section 3017.(b) Except at a primary election for partisan office, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the voter’s party preference may not be stamped or printed on the identification envelope.(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (9) of subdivision (a), a ballot shall not be disqualified solely because the person authorized to return it did not provide on the identification envelope their name or signature.(d) County elections officials may continue to use existing supplies prior to printing new identification envelopes that reflect the changes made to this section by the act adding this subdivision.SEC. 8. Section 3019 of the Elections Code is amended to read:3019. (a) (1) Upon receiving a vote by mail ballot, the elections official shall compare the signature on the identification envelope with either of the following to determine if the signatures compare:(A) The signature appearing on the voter’s affidavit of registration or any previous affidavit of registration of the voter.(B) The signature appearing on a form issued by an elections official that contains the voter’s signature and that is part of the voter’s registration record.(2) All of the following apply to the comparison of signatures pursuant to this section, including the comparison of a voter’s signature on a signature verification statement, an unsigned identification envelope statement, or a combined vote by mail ballot signature verification statement and unsigned identification envelope statement, with the signature that is part of the voter’s registration record:(A) A presumption exists that the signature on the identification envelope, signature verification statement, unsigned identification envelope statement, or provisional ballot envelope is the voter’s signature.(B) An exact match is not required for an elections official to determine that a voter’s signature is valid. The fact that signatures share similar characteristics is sufficient to determine that a signature is valid.(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (D), the elections official shall consider explanations for discrepancies between signatures that are specified in regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State. For purposes of this subparagraph, explanations include a variation in signature style over time and the haste with which a signature is written.(D) When comparing signatures, an elections official shall not review or consider a voter’s party preference, race, or ethnicity.(E) The elections official may consider characteristics of the written signature that are specified in regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State. For purposes of this subparagraph, characteristics include the slant of the signature, letter formation, and whether the signature is printed or written in cursive.(F) The elections official may use facsimiles of voters’ signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with the law.(G) In comparing signatures pursuant to this section, an elections official may use signature verification technology. If signature verification technology determines that the signatures do not compare, the signature is subject to the additional procedures described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).(H) The variation of a signature caused by the substitution of initials for the first or middle name, or both, is not grounds for the elections official to determine that the signatures do not compare.(I) A signature made using a mark such as an “X,” or made by a signature stamp, shall be presumed valid and shall be accepted if the signature meets the requirements of Section 354.5.(b) If upon conducting the comparison of signatures pursuant to subdivision (a) the elections official determines that the signatures compare, and if the elections official determines that the identification envelope contains the information required pursuant to Section 3019.3, the elections official shall deposit the ballot, still in the identification envelope, in a ballot container in the elections official’s office.(c) (1) If upon conducting the comparison of signatures pursuant to subdivision (a) the elections official determines that the signature possesses multiple, significant, and obvious differing characteristics when compared to all signatures in the voter’s registration record, the signature is subject to the additional procedures described in paragraph (2).(2) If the elections official makes the determination described in paragraph (1), the signature shall be rejected only if two additional elections officials each find beyond a reasonable doubt that the signature differs in multiple, significant, and obvious respects from all signatures in the voter’s registration record. If the officials determine that the signatures do not compare, the identification envelope shall not be opened and the ballot shall not be counted. The elections official shall write the cause of the rejection on the face of the identification envelope only after completing the procedures described in subdivision (d).(d) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (E), on or before the next business day after a determination that a voter’s signature does not compare pursuant to subdivision (c), but not later than eight days prior to the certification of the election, the elections official shall send by first-class mail notice to the voter of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election. The notice shall include a return envelope, with postage paid, for the voter to return a signature verification statement.(B) If an elections official has a telephone number or email address on file for a voter whose signature does not compare pursuant to subdivision (c), the elections official shall notify the voter by telephone, a text message, or email of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature. If an elections official calls the voter and the voter does not answer, the elections official shall attempt to leave a voicemail message.(C) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may send additional written notices to a voter identified pursuant to subdivision (c), and may also notify the voter in person or by other means of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature.(D) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may use any information in a county’s election management system, or otherwise in the elections official’s possession, for the purpose of notifying the voter of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature.(E) If it is impracticable under the circumstances for the elections official to send the notice described in subparagraph (A) on or before the next business day, including in the event of technological failure, the elections official shall send the notice as soon as practicable, but not later than eight days prior to the certification of the election.(2) The notice and instructions shall be in substantially the following form:“READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY. FAILURE TO FOLLOW THESE INSTRUCTIONS MAY CAUSE YOUR VOTE BY MAIL BALLOT NOT TO COUNT.1. We have determined that the signature you provided on your vote by mail ballot does not compare with the signature(s) on file in your voter record. In order to ensure that your vote by mail ballot will be counted, the signature verification statement must be completed and returned as soon as possible.2. The signature verification statement must be received by the elections official of the county where you are registered to vote no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to certification of the election.3. You must sign your name where specified on the signature verification statement (Voter’s Signature).4. Place the signature verification statement into the postage-paid return envelope if it is included with these instructions. If a return envelope is not included with these instructions, use your own mailing envelope addressed to your local elections official. Mail, deliver, or have the completed statement delivered to the elections official. If you mail your completed statement using your own envelope, be sure there is sufficient postage and that the address of the elections official is correct.5. If you do not wish to send the signature verification statement by mail or have it delivered, you may submit your completed statement by email or facsimile transmission to your local elections official, or by other electronic means made available by your local elections official, or submit your completed statement to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box before the close of the polls on election day.”(3) The notice and instructions shall be translated in all languages required in that county by Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).(4) The elections official shall not reject a vote by mail ballot identified pursuant to subdivision (c) if each of the following conditions is satisfied:(A) The voter delivers, in person, by mail, by fax, by email, or by other means, a signature verification statement signed by the voter and the elections official receives the statement no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election, or the voter, before the close of the polls on election day, completes and submits a signature verification statement to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box.(B) Upon receipt of the signature verification statement, the elections official shall compare the signature on the statement with the signature on file in the voter’s record.(i) If upon conducting the comparison of signatures the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the elections official shall deposit the ballot, still in the identification envelope, in a ballot container in the elections official’s office.(ii) If, under the standards and procedures of subdivision (c), a determination is made that the signatures do not compare, the identification envelope shall not be opened and the ballot shall not be counted. The elections official shall write the cause of the rejection on the face of the identification envelope.(5) The signature verification statement shall be in substantially the following form and may be included on the same page as the notice and instructions specified in paragraph (2):“SIGNATURE VERIFICATION STATEMENTI,, am a registered voter of __________ County,State of California. I declare under penalty of perjury that I received and returned a vote by mail ballot. I am a resident of the precinct in which I have voted, and I am the person whose name appears on the vote by mail ballot envelope. I understand that if I commit or attempt any fraud in connection with voting, or if I aid or abet fraud or attempt to aid or abet fraud in connection with voting, I may be convicted of a felony punishable by imprisonment for 16 months or two or three years. I understand that my failure to sign this statement means that my vote by mail ballot will be invalidated.Voter’s SignatureAddress” (6) If the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the official shall use the signature in the signature verification statement, even if returned untimely, to update the voter’s signature for future elections.(e) (1) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, if an elections official determines that a voter has failed to sign the identification envelope, the elections official shall not reject the vote by mail ballot if the voter does any of the following:(i) Signs the identification envelope at the office of the elections official during regular business hours no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election.(ii) No later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election, completes and submits an unsigned identification envelope statement in substantially the following form:“UNSIGNED IDENTIFICATION ENVELOPE STATEMENTI,, am a registered voter of __________ County,State of California. I declare under penalty of perjury that I received and returned a vote by mail ballot and that I have not and will not vote more than one ballot in this election. I am a resident of the precinct in which I have voted, and I am the person whose name appears on the vote by mail ballot envelope. I understand that if I commit or attempt any fraud in connection with voting, or if I aid or abet fraud or attempt to aid or abet fraud in connection with voting, I may be convicted of a felony punishable by imprisonment for 16 months or two or three years. I understand that my failure to sign this statement means that my vote by mail ballot will be invalidated.Voter’s SignatureAddress” (iii) Before the close of the polls on election day, completes and submits an unsigned identification envelope statement, in the form described in clause (ii), to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box.(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (v), or before the next business day after discovering that a voter has failed to sign the identification envelope, but not later than eight days prior to the certification of the election, the elections official shall send by first-class mail notice and instructions to the voter of the opportunity to provide a signature no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election. The notice shall include a return envelope, with postage paid, for the voter to return the unsigned identification envelope statement.(ii) If an elections official has a telephone number or email address on file for a voter who has failed to sign the identification envelope, the elections official shall notify the voter by telephone, a text message, or email of the opportunity to provide a signature. If an elections official calls the voter and the voter does not answer, the elections official shall attempt to leave a voicemail message.(iii) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may send additional written notices to a voter identified pursuant to this subdivision, and may also notify the voter in person or by other means of the opportunity to provide a signature.(iv) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may use any information in the county’s election management system, or otherwise in the elections official’s possession, for the purpose of notifying the voter of the opportunity to provide a signature.(v) If it is impracticable under the circumstances for the elections official to send the notice described in clause (i) on or before the next business day, including in the event of technological failure, the elections official shall send the notice as soon as practicable, but not later than eight days prior to the certification of the election.(C) If timely submitted, the elections official shall accept any completed unsigned identification envelope statement. Upon receipt of the unsigned identification envelope statement, the elections official shall compare the voter’s signature on the statement in the manner provided by this section.(i) If the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the elections official shall attach the unsigned identification envelope statement to the identification envelope and deposit the ballot, still in the identification envelope, in a ballot container in the elections official’s office.(ii) If, under the standards and procedures of subdivision (c), a determination is made that the signatures do not compare, the identification envelope shall not be opened and the elections official shall provide notice to the voter pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).(D) An elections official may use methods other than those described in subparagraph (A) to obtain a voter’s signature on an unsigned identification envelope statement.(2) Instructions shall accompany the unsigned identification envelope statement in substantially the following form:“READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY BEFORE COMPLETING THE STATEMENT. FAILURE TO FOLLOW THESE INSTRUCTIONS MAY CAUSE YOUR BALLOT NOT TO COUNT.1. In order to ensure that your vote by mail ballot will be counted, your statement should be completed and returned as soon as possible, but no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election.2. You must sign your name on the line above (Voter’s Signature).3. Place the statement into the postage-paid return envelope if it is included with these instructions. If a return envelope is not included with these instructions, use your own mailing envelope addressed to your local elections official. Mail, deliver, or have delivered the completed statement to the elections official. If you mail your completed statement using your own envelope, be sure there is sufficient postage and that the address of the elections official is correct.4. If you do not wish to send the statement by mail or have it delivered, you may submit your completed statement by facsimile or email transmission to your local elections official, or by other electronic means made available by your local elections official, or submit your completed statement to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box before the close of the polls on election day.”(3) The notice and instructions shall be translated in all languages required in that county by Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).(f) An elections official shall include a single, combined vote by mail ballot signature verification statement and unsigned ballot identification envelope statement, along with the instructions provided in this section for the completion of the statement, on the elections official’s internet website and shall provide the elections official’s mailing address, email address, and facsimile transmission number on the internet web page containing the statement and instructions. The elections official shall accept the combined statement from a voter for the purpose of satisfying the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e). An elections official may mail the combined statement to a voter pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) in lieu of the signature verification statement or unsigned ballot identification envelope statement.(g) A local elections official offering other electronic means for submission of a statement described in this section shall establish appropriate privacy and security protocols that ensure that the information transmitted is received directly and securely by the elections official and is only used for the stated purposes of verifying the signature on the voter’s ballot.(h) A ballot shall not be removed from its identification envelope until the time for processing ballots. A ballot shall not be rejected for cause after the identification envelope has been opened.(i) For purposes of this section, “certification of the election” means the date the particular elections official submits a certified statement of the results of the election to the governing body pursuant to Section 15372, even if that occurs before the deadline to submit the certified statement of the election results set forth in Section 15372.(j) In comparing signatures pursuant to this section, including when using signature verification software or other technology, an elections official shall adhere to all applicable regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State.(k) An elections official is authorized to use contact information provided on a voter’s affidavit of registration to contact a voter for purposes consistent with this section.SEC. 9. Section 3019.1 is added to the Elections Code, to read:3019.1. (a) The State Auditor shall audit county elections officials by reviewing random samples of the signature comparisons conducted by the elections official. The State Auditor shall determine whether the signature comparisons comply with the requirements set forth in Section 3019.(b) The State Auditor shall report the findings of the audits described in subdivision (a) no later than 90 days after each election.(c) If the State Auditor determines in an audit that an elections official has a signature comparison error rate of 5 percent or greater, the elections official shall prepare a remediation plan identifying the steps the elections official will take to correct the errors identified by the State Auditor. The elections official shall submit the remediation plan to the Secretary of State.SEC. 10. Section 3019.3 is added to the Elections Code, to read:3019.3. In addition to the requirements of Section 3019, before an elections official may process and count a vote by mail ballot, the elections official shall confirm that the last four digits of the voter’s valid government-issued form of identification listed on the identification envelope match the voter’s valid government-issued form of identification listed on the voter’s affidavit of registration.SEC. 11. Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3200) is added to Division 3 of the Elections Code, to read: CHAPTER 3. Vote by Mail Procedures in Counties with Inaccurate Voter Rosters or Counties that Fail to Count Ballots in a Timely Manner3200. This chapter applies in either of the following circumstances:(a) A statewide election in a county immediately following a determination by the State Auditor pursuant to Section 2186 that fewer than 98 percent of the persons listed on the roster are qualified electors in that county.(b) A statewide election in a county immediately following an election for which the elections official in that county failed to count all ballots, except provisional ballots and vote by mail ballots for which a voter has the opportunity either to verify their signature pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3019 or to provide their signature pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3019, by no later than 10 days after the election pursuant to Section 15301.3201. (a) Any voter may apply for a vote by mail ballot. The voter shall complete an application, which shall be available from the elections official, and which shall contain all of the following:(1) The applicant’s name at length.(2) The applicant’s residence address.(3) The address where the ballot is to be mailed, if different from the place of residence.(4) The signature of the applicant.(b) Upon receipt of an application for a vote by mail ballot and a determination that the applicant is an eligible voter, the elections official shall add the applicant to a list of voters to be provided vote by mail ballots for the next statewide election.3202. No later than 29 days before the day of the statewide election, the elections official shall begin mailing the materials specified in Section 3010 to every voter eligible for a vote by mail ballot pursuant to Section 3201.SEC. 12. Section 10005 of the Elections Code is repealed.10005.A local government shall not enact or enforce any charter provision, ordinance, or regulation requiring a person to present identification for the purpose of voting or submitting a ballot at any polling place, vote center, or other location where ballots are cast or submitted, unless required by state or federal law. For the purpose of this section, “local government” means any charter or general law city, charter or general law county, or any city and county.SEC. 13. Section 14216.5 is added to the Elections Code, to read:14216.5. In addition to the requirements of Section 14216, before a person desiring to vote at a polling place may vote, the person shall present a valid government-issued form of identification to a precinct board member.SEC. 14. Section 15301 of the Elections Code is amended to read:15301. (a) The canvass shall commence no later than the Thursday following the election, shall be open to the public, and, for state or statewide elections, shall result in a report of results to the Secretary of State. The(b) (1) The canvass shall be continued daily, Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays excepted, for not less than six hours each day until completed.(2) (A) The elections official shall count all ballots, except provisional ballots and vote by mail ballots for which a voter has the opportunity either to verify their signature pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3019 or to provide their signature pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3019, by no later than 72 hours after the election.(B) An elections official that fails to meet the requirement in subparagraph (A) shall not mail the materials specified in Section 3010 to every registered voter pursuant to Section 3000.5 for the next statewide election. For the next statewide election, the elections official shall mail a vote by mail ballot to any qualified elector who requests a vote by mail ballot pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3200) of Division 3.SEC. 15. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to improve the integrity of state and local elections by requiring a government-issued ID to vote, verifying the citizenship of voters, maintaining accurate voter lists, incentivizing timely counting of ballots, and enhancing the signature review process.